Rhode Island statutes. Title 33 Probate Practice and Procedure
Chapter 16 Veterans’ Guardianships

33-16-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Uniform Veterans’ Guardianship Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1711, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

33-16-1

.

33-16-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Administrator” means the administrator of veterans affairs of the United States or his or her successor.

“Benefits” means all money paid or payable by the United States through the veterans administration.

“Conservator” shall mean any person acting as fiduciary for the estate of any “ward” who by reason of advanced age or mental weakness is unable to properly care for his or her estate.

“Estate” means income on hand and assets acquired partially or wholly with “income”.

“Guardian” shall mean any person acting as fiduciary for the person and estate or person or estate of any “ward”.

“Guardian” shall include conservators.

“Income” means money received from the veterans administration and revenue or profit from any property wholly or partially acquired therewith.

“Person” means an individual, a partnership, a corporation or an association.

“Veterans administration” means the veterans administration, its predecessors or successors.

“Ward” means a beneficiary of the veterans administration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1711, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-16-2

.

33-16-3.
Administrator as party to guardianship proceedings — Notice.

The administrator shall be a party in interest in any proceeding for the appointment or removal of a guardian, or for the removal of the disability of minority or mental incapacity of a ward, and in any suit or other proceeding affecting in any manner the administration by the guardian of the estate of any present or former ward whose estate includes assets derived in whole or in part from benefits before or hereafter paid by the veterans administration. Not less than fifteen (15) days prior to a hearing in this matter, notice in writing of the time and place of the hearing shall be given by mail (unless waived in writing) to the office of the veterans administration having jurisdiction over the area in which any suit or any proceeding is pending.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1711, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

33-16-3

.

33-16-4.
Appointments governed by chapter.

Whenever, pursuant to any law of the United States or regulation of the veterans administration, it is necessary, prior to the payment of benefits, that a guardian be appointed, the appointment may be made in the manner provided in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1711, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

33-16-4

.

33-16-5.
Maximum number of wards.

No person other than a bank or trust company shall be a guardian of more than five (5) wards at one time, unless all the wards are members of one family. Upon presentation of a petition by an attorney of the veterans administration, or other interested person, alleging that a guardian is acting in a fiduciary capacity for more than five (5) wards as provided in this chapter and requesting his or her discharge for that reason, the court, upon proof substantiating the petition, shall require a final accounting forthwith from the guardian and shall discharge him or her from guardianships in excess of five (5) and forthwith appoint a successor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1711, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

33-16-5

.

33-16-6.
Filing of petition for appointment of guardian.

A petition for the appointment of a guardian may be filed by any relative or friend of the ward or by any person who is authorized by law to file a petition. If there is no person so authorized or if the person so authorized refuses or fails to file a petition within thirty (30) days after the mailing of notice by the veterans administration to the last known address of the person, if any, indicating the necessity for the appointment, a petition for appointment may be filed by any resident of this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1711, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

33-16-6

.

33-16-7.
Contents of petition for appointment.

The petition for appointment shall set forth the name, age, place of residence of the ward, the name and place of residence of the nearest relative, if known, and the fact that the ward is entitled to receive benefits payable by or through the veterans administration and shall set forth the amount of money then due and the amount of probable future payments.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1711, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

33-16-7

.

33-16-8.
Additional facts shown by petition — Selection of guardian.

The petition shall also set forth the name and address of the person or institution, if any, having actual custody of the ward and the name, age, relationship, if any, occupation and address of the proposed guardian, and if the nominee is a natural person, the number of wards for whom the nominee is presently acting as guardian. Notwithstanding any law as to priority of persons entitled to appointment, or the nomination in the petition, the court may appoint some other individual, a bank, or trust company as guardian, if the court determines it is for the best interest of the ward.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1711, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

33-16-8

.

33-16-9.
Rating of mental incompetence shown in petition.

In the case of a mentally incompetent ward, the petition shall show if this be the fact, that the ward has been rated incompetent by the veterans administration on examination in accordance with the laws and regulations governing the veterans administration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1711, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

33-16-9

.

33-16-10.
Showing of minority as evidence of necessity for guardian.

Where a petition is filed for the appointment of a guardian for a minor, a certificate of the administrator or his or her authorized representative, setting forth the age of the minor as shown by the records of the veterans administration, and the fact that the appointment of a guardian is a condition precedent to the payment of any money due the minor by the veterans administration, may be used as prima facie evidence of the necessity for the appointment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1711, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

33-16-10

.

33-16-11.
Certificate of mental incompetence as evidence of necessity for guardian.

Where a petition is filed for the appointment of a guardian for a mentally incompetent ward, a certificate of the administrator or his or her duly authorized representative, that the person has been rated incompetent by the veterans administration on examination in accordance with the laws and regulations governing the veterans administration, and that the appointment of a guardian is a condition precedent to the payment of any money due the ward by the veterans administration, shall be prima facie evidence of the necessity for the appointment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1711, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

33-16-11

.

33-16-12.
Notice of petition for guardianship.

Upon the filing of a petition for the appointment of a guardian under this chapter, notice shall be given to the ward, to any other persons, and in any manner as is provided by the general law of this state, and also to the veterans administration as provided by this chapter.

Where no person is designated to give a notice required by this section, the clerk of the proper court shall give the requisite notice.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1711, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

33-16-12

.

33-16-13.
Filing of bond.

Upon the appointment of a guardian, he or she shall execute and file a bond to be approved by the court in an amount not less than the estimated value of the personal estate and anticipated income of the ward during the ensuing year. The bond shall be in the form and be conditioned as required of guardians appointed under the general guardianship laws of this state. The court may from time to time require the guardian to file an additional bond.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1711, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

33-16-13

.

33-16-14.
Sureties on bond.

Where a bond is tendered by a guardian with personal sureties, there shall be at least two (2) sureties and they shall file with the court a certificate under oath which shall describe the property owned, both real and personal, and shall state that each is worth the sum named in the bond as the penalty thereof over and above all his or her debts and liabilities and the aggregate of other bonds on which he or she is principal or surety and exclusive of property exempt from execution. The court may require additional security or may require a corporate surety bond, the premium on the bond to be paid from the ward’s estate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1711, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

33-16-14

.

33-16-15.
Filing of annual account.

Every guardian, who has received or shall receive on account of his or her ward any money or other thing of value from the veterans administration shall file with the court annually, in addition to any other accounts as may be required by the court, a full, true, and accurate account under oath of all money or other things of value received by him or her, all earnings, interest or profits derived therefrom, all property acquired therewith, all disbursements therefrom, and showing the balance thereof in his or her hands at the date of the account and how it is invested.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1711, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

33-16-15

.

33-16-16.
Exhibition of securities and investments — Filing of certificates.

The guardian, at the time of filing any account, shall exhibit all securities or investments held by him or her to an officer of the bank or other depository wherein the securities or investments are held for safekeeping, or to an authorized representative of the corporation which is surety on his or her bond, or to the judge or clerk of a court of record in this state, or, upon request of the guardian or other interested party, to any other reputable person designated by the court, who shall certify in writing that he or she has examined the securities or investments and identified them with those described in the account, and shall note any omissions or discrepancies. If the depository is the guardian, the certifying officer shall not be the officer verifying the account. The guardian may exhibit the securities or investments to the judge of the court, who shall endorse on the account and copy a certificate that the securities or investments shown to him or her as held by the guardian were each in fact exhibited to him or her and that those exhibited to him or her were the same as those shown in the account, and noting any omission or discrepancy. That certificate and the certificate of an official of the bank in which are deposited any funds for which the guardian is accountable, showing the amount on deposit, shall be prepared and signed in duplicate and one of each shall be filed by the guardian with his or her account.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1711, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

33-16-16

.

33-16-17.
Notice of proceedings to veterans administration and others.

At the time of filing in the court any account, a certified copy of the account and a signed duplicate of each certificate filed with the court shall be sent by the guardian to the office of the veterans administration having jurisdiction over the area in which the court is located. A signed duplicate, or a certified copy of any petition, motion or other pleading, pertaining to an account, or to any matter other than an account, and which is filed in the guardianship proceedings or in any proceeding for the purpose of removing the disability of minority or mental incapacity, shall be furnished by the person filing the same to the proper office of the veterans administration. Unless a hearing be waived in writing by the attorney of the veterans administration, and by all other persons, if any, entitled to notice, the court shall fix a time and place for the hearing on the account, petition, motion or other pleading not less than fifteen (15) days nor more than sixty (60) days from the date same is filed, unless a different available date be stipulated in writing. Unless waived in writing, written notice of the time and place of hearing shall be given to the veterans administration office concerned, the guardian and any others entitled to notice, not less than fifteen (15) days prior to the date fixed for the hearing. The notice may be given by mail in which event it shall be deposited in the mail not less than fifteen (15) days prior to the hearing date. The court, or clerk of court, shall mail to the veterans administration office a copy of each order entered in any guardianship proceeding in which the administrator is an interested party.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1711, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

33-16-17

.

33-16-18.
Accounting for property other than from veterans administration.

If the guardian is accountable for property derived from sources other than the veterans administration, he or she shall be accountable as is or may be required under the applicable law of this state pertaining to the property of minors or persons of unsound mind who are not beneficiaries of the veterans administration, and as to any other property shall be entitled to the compensation provided by law. The account for other property may be combined with the account filed in accordance with §

33-16-15

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1711, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

33-16-18

.

33-16-19.
Grounds for removal of guardian.

If any guardian shall fail to file with the court any account as required by this chapter, or by an order of the court, when any account is due or within thirty (30) days after a citation issues as provided by law, or shall fail to furnish the veterans administration a true copy of any account, petition or pleading as required by this chapter, such failure may, in the discretion of the court, be grounds for his or her removal.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1711, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

33-16-19

.

33-16-20.
Compensation of guardians.

Compensation payable to guardians shall be based upon services rendered and shall not exceed five percent (5%) of the amount of money received during the period covered by the account. In the event of extraordinary services by any guardian, the court, upon petition and hearing, may authorize reasonable additional compensation for the guardian. A copy of the petition and notice of hearing shall be given to the proper office of the veterans administration in the manner provided in the case of a hearing on a guardian’s account or other pleading. No commission or compensation shall be allowed on the money or other assets received from a prior guardian, nor upon the amount received from liquidation of loans, or other investments.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1711, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

33-16-20

.

33-16-21.
Investments.

Every guardian shall invest the surplus funds of his or her ward’s estate in securities or property as authorized under the laws of this state, but only upon prior order of the court; except that the funds may be invested, without prior court authorization, in direct unconditional interest bearing obligations of this state or of the United States and in obligations the interest and principal of which are unconditionally guaranteed by the United States. A signed duplicate or certified copy of the petition for authority to invest shall be furnished the proper office of the veterans administration, and notice of a hearing on investments shall be given the office as provided in the case of hearing on a guardian’s account.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1711, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

33-16-21

.

33-16-22.
Support of persons other than ward, spouse, and children.

A guardian shall not apply any portion of the income or the estate for the support or maintenance of any person other than the ward, the spouse and the minor children of the ward, except upon petition to the probate court and prior order thereon after a hearing. A signed duplicate or certified copy of the petition shall be furnished the proper office of the veterans administration and notice of hearing thereon shall be given the office as provided in the case of hearing on a guardian’s account or other pleading.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1711, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

33-16-22

.

33-16-23.
Purchase of real estate.

The court may authorize the purchase of the entire fee simple title or the entire equity of redemption to real estate in this state in which the guardian has no interest, but only as a home for the ward, or to protect his or her interest, or as a home for his or her dependent family. The purchase of real estate shall not be made except upon the entry of an order of the court after hearing upon verified petition. A copy of the petition shall be furnished the proper office of the veterans administration and notice of a hearing on the purchase of real estate shall be given the office as provided in the case of a hearing on a guardian’s account.

Before authorizing this investment, the court shall require written evidence of value, title and the advisability of acquiring the real estate. Title shall be taken in the ward’s name. This section does not limit the right of the guardian on behalf of his or her ward to bid and to become the purchaser of real estate at a sale thereof pursuant to a decree of foreclosure of lien held by or for the ward, or at a trustee’s sale, to protect the ward’s right in the property so foreclosed or sold; nor does it limit the right of the guardian, if necessary to protect the ward’s interest and upon prior order of the court in which the guardianship is pending, to agree with co-tenants of the ward for a partition in kind, or to purchase from co-tenants the entire undivided interests held by them, or to bid and purchase the real estate at a sale under a partition decree, or to compromise adverse claims of title to the ward’s realty.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1711, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

33-16-23

; P.L. 1959, ch. 88, § 1.

33-16-24.
Certified copies of public records.

When a copy of any public record is required by the veterans administration to be used in determining the eligibility of any person to participate in benefits made available by the veterans administration, the official custodian of the public record shall, without charge, provide the applicant for the benefits, any person acting on his or her behalf, or the authorized representative of the veterans administration, with a certified copy of the record.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1711, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

33-16-24

.

33-16-25.
Termination of guardianship.

In addition to any other provisions of law relating to judicial restoration and discharge of a guardian, a certificate by the veterans administration showing that a minor ward has attained majority, or that an incompetent ward has been rated competent by the veterans administration upon examination in accordance with law shall be prima facie evidence that the ward has attained majority, or has recovered his or her competency. Upon hearing after notice as provided by this chapter and the determination by the court that the ward has attained majority or has recovered his or her competency, an order shall be entered to that effect, and the guardian shall file a final account. Upon hearing after notice to the former ward and to the veterans administration as in case of other accounts, upon approval of the final account, and upon delivery to the ward of the assets due him or her from the guardian, the guardian shall be discharged and his or her sureties released.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1711, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

33-16-25

.

33-16-26.
Commitment to federal agency for medical treatment.

Whenever, in any proceeding under the laws of this state for the commitment of a person alleged to be of unsound mind or otherwise in need of confinement in a hospital or other institution for his or her proper care, it is determined after adjudication of the status of the person as may be required by law that commitment to a hospital for mental disease or other institution is necessary for safekeeping or treatment and it appears that the person is eligible for care or treatment by the veterans administration or other agency of the United States government, the court, upon receipt of a certificate from the veterans administration or other agency showing that facilities are available and that the person is eligible for care or treatment therein, may commit the person to the veterans administration or other agency. The person whose commitment is sought shall be personally served with notice of the pending commitment proceeding in the manner as provided by the law of this state; and nothing in this chapter shall affect his or her right to appear and be heard in the proceedings.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1711, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

33-16-26

.

33-16-27.
Powers of federal agencies over persons committed — Retention of jurisdiction by court.

Upon commitment, a person, when admitted to any facility operated by any federal agency within or outside of this state, shall be subject to the rules and regulations of the veterans administration or other agency. The chief officer of any facility of the veterans administration or institution operated by any other agency of the United States to which the person is committed shall with respect to that person be vested with the same powers as superintendents of state hospitals for mental diseases within this state with respect to retention of custody, transfer, parole or discharge. Jurisdiction is retained in the committing or other appropriate court of this state at any time to inquire into the mental condition of the person so committed, and to determine the necessity for continuance of his or her restraint, and all commitments pursuant to this chapter are so conditioned.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1711, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

33-16-27

.

33-16-28.
Effect of commitments by foreign courts.

The judgment or order of commitment by a court of competent jurisdiction of another state or of the District of Columbia committing a person to the veterans administration, or other agency of the United States government for care or treatment shall have the same force and effect as to the committed person while in this state as in the jurisdiction in which is situated the court entering the judgment or making the order; and the courts of the committing state, or the District of Columbia, shall be deemed to have retained jurisdiction of the person committed for the purpose of inquiring into the mental condition of the person, and of determining the necessity for continuance of his or her restraint as is provided in §

33-16-27

with respect to persons committed by the courts of this state. Consent is hereby given to the application of the law of the committing state or district in respect to the authority of the chief officer of any facility of the veterans administration, or of any institution operated in this state by any other agency of the United States, to retain custody, or transfer, parole, or discharge the committed person.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1711, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

33-16-28

.

33-16-29.
Transfer of persons with mental illness to federal agencies.

Upon receipt of a certificate of the veterans administration or other agency of the United States that facilities are available for the care or treatment of any person theretofore committed to any hospital or other institution for the care or treatment of persons with mental illness and that the person is eligible for care or treatment, the superintendent of the institution may cause the transfer of the person to the veterans administration or other agency of the United States for care or treatment. Upon effecting any transfer, the committing court or proper court officer shall be notified of the transfer by the transferring agency. No person shall be transferred to the veterans administration or other agency of the United States if he or she be confined pursuant to conviction of any felony or misdemeanor, or if he or she has been acquitted of the charge solely on the ground of insanity, unless prior to transfer the court or other authority originally committing the person shall enter an order for such transfer after appropriate motion and hearing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1711, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

33-16-29

; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 78; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 78.

33-16-30.
Transfer to federal agency having effect of original commitment.

Any person transferred as provided in §

33-16-29

shall be deemed to be committed to the veterans administration or other agency of the United States pursuant to the original commitment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1711, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

33-16-30

.

33-16-31.
Commitment of insane person to federal agency.

Upon the written application of the parent, guardian, relative or friend of any person, accompanied by the certificate of two (2) practicing physicians, registered in the state, that the person is insane, the veterans administration or other agency of the United States government, is hereby authorized to receive the insane person for care and treatment upon terms as may be fixed by the veterans administration or other agency of the United States government in its discretion.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1711, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

33-16-31

.

33-16-32.
Applicability of general laws of guardian and ward.

Except where inconsistent with this chapter, laws of this state relating to guardian, ward, and the judicial practice relating thereto, including the right to trial by jury and the right of appeal, shall be applicable to beneficiaries and their estates.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1711, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

33-16-32

.

33-16-33.
Applicability of chapter to guardians appointed under other law.

The provisions of this chapter relating to surety bonds and the administration of estates of wards shall apply to all “income” and “estate” as defined in §

33-16-2

, whether the guardian shall have been appointed under this chapter or under any other law of this state, special or general, prior or subsequent to the enactment of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1711, § 23; G.L. 1956, §

33-16-33

.

33-16-34.
Uniformity of construction.

This chapter shall be construed to make uniform the law of those states which enact it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1711, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

33-16-34

.

33-16-35.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1711, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

33-16-35

.